ko: 컨테이너 타입에 적합: 병; 캔; 범용; 기타
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto posode: Steklenica; Pločevinka; Univerzalno; Drugo
zh-TW: 適用容器類型: 瓶子; 罐子; 通用; 其他
tr: Konteyner tipine uygun: Şişe; Teneke; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer
th: เหมาะกับประเภทภาชนะ: ขวด; กระป๋อง; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
nl: Type geschikt voor container: Fles; Blik; Universeel; Andere
hu: Tárolótípus: Palack; Fémdoboz; Univerzális; Egyéb
cs: Vhodné pro typ kontejneru: Láhev; Plechovka; Univerzální; Jiné
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de recipiente: Garrafa; Lata; Universal; Outro
sv: Lämplig för containertyp: Flaska; Burk; Universell; Övrigt
pl: Odpowiednie do rodzaju pojemnika: Butelka; Puszka; Uniwersalny; Inne
pt-BR: Adequado para o tipo de contêiner: Garrafa; Lata; Universal; Outro
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ nádoby: Fľaša; Plechovka; Univerzálny; Iné
ru: Для какого типа емкости: Бутылка; Банка; Универсальный; Другой
it: Adatto per il tipo di contenitore: Bottiglia; Lattina; Universale; Altro
lt-LT: Tinka talpos tipui: Buteliukas; Skardinė; Universalus; Kita
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο δοχείου: Μπουκάλι; Δοχείο; Universal; Άλλο
da: Velegnet til beholdertype: Flaske; Dåse; Universal; Andet
zh-CN: 适用的容器类型: 酒瓶; 罐; 通用; 其他
fi: Sopii konttityyppiin: Pullo; Tölkki; Yleinen; Muu
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de recipient: Sticlă; Doză; Universal; Altele
nb: Egnet for beholdertype: Flaske; Boks; Universal; Annet
es: Adecuado para el tipo de contenedor: Botella; Lata; Universal; Otros
fr: Convient au type de conteneur: Bouteille; Cannette; Universel; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta spremnika za koji je prikladno: Boca; Limenka; Univerzalno; Ostalo
vi: Phù hợp với loại thùng chứa: Chai; Vỏ đồ hộp; Phổ biến; Khác
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип контейнер: Бутилка; Консерва; Универсален; Други
en: Suitable for container type: Bottle; Can; Universal; Other
de: Geeignet für Behältertyp: Flasche; Dose; Universell; Sonstiges
ja: 容器タイプに適しています: ボトル; 缶; ユニバーサル; その他